Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3104
Client or patient, defined.

Client or patient means a recipient of psychological services within the context of a professional relationship. In the case of individuals with legal guardians, including minors and incompetent adults, the legal guardian shall also be considered a client or patient for decisionmaking purposes.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 65;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1038.